Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-230
Proof in lieu of acknowledgment; witness; disobedience to subpoena; penalty.

Every person served with a subpoena and tendered the fees of a witness who, without reasonable cause, refuses or neglects to appear, or appearing, refuses to answer upon oath touching the matters referred to in section 76-228, shall forfeit to the party injured one hundred dollars and may also be committed to prison by the officer who issued such subpoena, there to remain without bail until he or she shall submit to answer upon oath as aforesaid.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 9, p. 281;

R.S.1913, § 6205;

C.S.1922, § 5604;

C.S.1929, § 76-210;

R.S.1943, § 76-230;

Laws 1991, LB 1, § 6.